Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Article 1. Tribal Identification Cards

Editor's notes. —

There is no article 2 in this chapter as enacted.

§ 8-7-101.
Tribal identification cards.

An identification card issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or Northern Arapaho Tribe that includes the requirements of W.S. 31-8-102(a)(i) through (vi) and (ix) shall be considered a valid form of identification for all purposes for which an identification card issued under W.S.

31-8-101

may be used.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added “and (ix).”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “of Wyoming” following “Tribe” twice, substituted “Arapaho” for “Arapahoe,” and made stylistic changes.

§ 8-7-102.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

No person shall:

Possess any cancelled, fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained tribal identification card;

Lend his tribal identification card to any other person or knowingly permit its use by another;

Display or represent a tribal identification card not issued to him as being his card;

Photograph, photostat, duplicate or in any way reproduce a tribal identification card or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card;

Use a tribal identification card that was obtained by false swearing, fraud or false statement of any kind or in any form.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 130, § 1.